zh-TW: 樂器弦材質: 銅色; 氟碳; 鎳; 尼龍; 鋼; 合成; 其他
ko: 악기 현 소재: 청동색; 탄화불소; 니켈; 나일론; 강철; 인조; 기타
en: Instrument string material: Bronze; Fluorocarbon; Nickel; Nylon; Steel; Synthetic; Other
el: Υλικό χορδών οργάνου: Ορείχαλκος; Φθοράνθρακας; Νικέλιο; Νάιλον; Χάλυβας; Συνθετικό; Άλλο
nl: Materiaal snaar instrument: Brons; Fluorkoolstof; Nikkel; Nylon; Staal; Synthetisch; Andere
pt-PT: Material das cordas do instrumento: Bronze; Fluorcarbono; Níquel; Náilon; Aço; Sintético; Outro
pt-BR: Material das cordas do instrumento: Bronze; Fluorcarbono; Níquel; Nylon; Aço; Sintético; Outro
nb: Instrumentstrengmateriale: Bronse; Fluorkarbon; Nikkel; Nylon; Stål; Syntetisk; Annet
ja: 楽器の弦の材質: ブロンズ; フロロカーボン; ニッケル; ナイロン; スチール; 合成品; その他
sk-SK: Materiál strún nástroja: Bronzový; Fluorokarbón; Nikel; Nylon; Oceľ; Syntetický; Iné
tr: Enstrüman teli malzemesi: Bronz; Florokarbon; Nikel; Plastik; Çelik; Sentetik; Diğer
lt-LT: Instrumento stygų medžiaga: Bronza; Fluorokarbonas; Nikelis; Nailonas; Plienas; Sintetika; Kita
da: Instrumentstrengs materiale: Bronze; Fluorocarbon; Nikkel; Nylon; Stål; Syntetisk; Andet
bg-BG: Материал на струните на инструменти: Бронз; Флуоровъглерод; Никел; Найлон; Стомана; Синтетичен; Други
de: Material der Instrumentensaiten: Bronze; Fluorkohlenstoff; Nickel; Nylon; Stahl; Synthetisch; Sonstiges
fi: Instrumentin kielten materiaali: Pronssi; Fluorihiili; Nikkeli; Nailon; Teräs; Synteettinen; Muu
fr: Matériau des cordes de l’instrument: Bronze; Fluorocarbon; Nickel; Nylon; Acier; Synthétique; Autre
es: Material de la cuerda del instrumento: Bronce; Fluorocarbono; Níquel; Nylon; Acero; Sintético; Otros
ro-RO: Material corzi instrument: Bronz; Fluorocarbon; Nichel; Nailon; Oțel; Sintetic; Altele
hu: Hangszer húrjának anyaga: Bronz; Fluorkarbon; Nikkel; Nejlon; Acél; Szintetikus; Egyéb
hr-HR: Materijal žice glazbala: Bronca; Fluorougljik; Nikal; Najlon; Čelik; Sintetika; Ostalo
zh-CN: 乐器琴弦材质: 青铜色; 氟碳; 镍; 尼龙; 钢; 合成; 其他
it: Materiale delle corde dello strumento: Bronzo; Fluorocarbonio; Nickel; Nylon; Acciaio; Sintetico; Altro
pl: Materiał struny instrumentu: Brąz; Perfluorowęglowodory; Nikiel; Nylon; Stal; Syntetyczne; Inne
cs: Materiál struny nástroje: Bronzová; Fluorokarbon; Nikl; Nylon; Ocel; Syntetické; Jiné
sl-SI: Material strun glasbila: Bron; Fluorokarbon; Nikelj; Najlon; Jeklo; Sintetika; Drugo
vi: Vật liệu dây nhạc cụ: Màu đồng; Fluorocarbon; Niken; Nylon; Thép; Tổng hợp; Khác
sv: Instrumentsträng - material: Brons; Fluorkol; Nickel; Nylon; Stål; Syntetisk; Övrigt
th: วัสดุที่ใช้ทำสายเครื่องดนตรี: สีบรอนซ์; ฟลูออโรคาร์บอน; นิกเกิล; ไนลอน; เหล็ก; สังเคราะห์; อื่นๆ
ru: Материал струн инструмента: Бронза; Фторуглерод; Никель; Нейлон; Сталь; Синтетика; Другой